Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8310
Marketing; written agreement required; approval of advertising; powers of director.

(1) A discount medical plan organization may market directly or contract with other marketers for the distribution of its product.

(2)(a) The discount medical plan organization shall have an executed written agreement with each marketer prior to the marketer's marketing, promoting, selling, or distributing the discount medical plan.

(b) The agreement between the discount medical plan organization and the marketer shall prohibit the marketer from using advertising, marketing materials, brochures, and discount medical plan cards without the discount medical plan organization's approval in writing.

(c) The discount medical plan organization shall be bound by and responsible for the activities of a marketer that are within the scope of the marketer's agency relationship with the organization.

(3) A discount medical plan organization shall approve in writing all advertisements, marketing materials, brochures, and discount cards used by marketers to market, promote, sell, or distribute the discount medical plan prior to their use.

(4) Upon request, a discount medical plan organization shall submit to the director all advertising, marketing materials, and brochures regarding a discount medical plan.

Laws 2008, LB855, § 42.